Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.070

Office hours prescribed by ordinance.

All code city offices shall be kept open for the transaction of business during such days and hours as the legislative body of such city shall by ordinance prescribe.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.070.]